New York, session 2025-2026, S1311.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 58 of the civil 2 service law, including the age requirements under paragraph (a) of 3 subdivision 1 of such section, or any other provision of law to the 4 contrary, Jonathan Montalvo, shall be eligible to be placed on the 5 eligible list for appointment as a full-time university police officer 6 with the state university of New York police, contingent upon his score 7 on a civil service examination for such position. 8 § 2. Jonathan Montalvo shall otherwise be subject to the merit and 9 fitness provisions of the civil service law applicable to full-time 10 university police officers. 11 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01333-02-5